Georgia, session 2025_26, HB840.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
An Act creating the Pickens County Airport Authority, approved April 19, 2006 (Ga. L.
2006, p. 3645), as amended, is hereby repealed in its entirety.
SECTION 2.
Any and all assets of the Pickens County Airport Authority shall devolve automatically and
without further action to Pickens County, Georgia. The Board of Commissioners of Pickens
County, Georgia, is authorized to execute any deeds or instruments of conveyance required
to place title of such assets into the name of Pickens County and is authorized to do so in the
name of the Pickens County Airport Authority. The obligations of the Pickens County
Airport Authority shall be transferred to and assumed by Pickens County, Georgia, by such
instruments as may be required to maintain the same. The Board of Commissioners of
H. B. 840
- 1 -

LC 62 0132/AP
Pickens County, Georgia, is authorized to execute any such instruments required to transfer
such obligations into the name of Pickens County and is authorized to do so in the name of
the Pickens County Airport Authority.
SECTION 3.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 840
- 2 -